Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB898.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Bargain collectively" means to carry out in good faith the mutual
obligation of the parties, or their representatives, to:
1. Meet at reasonable times, including meetings in advance of the
budget-making process;
2. Negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, and other
conditions of employment;
3. Negotiate an agreement;
4. Negotiate any question arising under any agreement; and
5. Execute a written contract incorporating any agreement reached.
The obligation shall not be interpreted to compel either party to agree to a
proposal or require either party to make a concession; and
(b) "Local association" means any organization that acts as a representative
for members employed by a school or school district.
(2) A local board of education and any local association shall bargain collectively in
pursuit of a collective bargaining agreement between a local board of education
and any local association that represents the interests of school employees or
personnel.
(3) A local board of education or local association found in violation of subsection
(2) of this section by a court of competent jurisdiction shall owe to the aggrieved
party an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:06 AM Jacketed